Massachusetts, session 194th, H1024.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subject to receipt of all approvals required under section 2 and following
satisfaction of all procedures adopted by the Massachusetts Water Resources Authority,
including the payment to the authority of an entrance fee, the authority may provide sewer
services through the town of Norwood to the property known and numbered as 313 and 317
Norwood Street and 5 Edge Hill Road in the town of Sharon, consisting of approximately 3.45
acres of land located at the intersection of Norwood street and Edge Hill road, which is more
particularly described as Lots 1, 2 and 3 in a plan of land entitled ‘Plan of Land in Sharon,
Mass.’ prepared by Paul N. Robinson, dated December 15, 1976, revised November 8, 1978,
which is recorded in said registry in plan book 271, plan 995, currently owned by Peter J.
of 2

Morandi, Trustee of the Morandi Family Realty Trust, u/d/t dated August 30, 2004 and recorded
with the Norfolk county registry of deeds in book 21624, page 222, which property is currently
under contract for sale to Sunrise Development, Inc. or its nominee, successor or assignee;
provided, however, that discharges shall not exceed 10,000 gallons per day unless an additional
volume is approved by the authority. The authority may allow the property to be used and
serviced by the sewer system to the same extent as parcels of property located within the district
currently served by the authority. All costs and expenses incurred for engineering, design and
construction, inclusive of all supervision, labor, equipment and materials, relative to the sewer
tie-in shall be paid by Sunrise Development, Inc, or its nominee, successor or assignee.
SECTION 2. The sewer connection to the town of Norwood’s infrastructure and the
provision of sewer services by the authority for any discharges shall commence only after the
authority’s board of directors has voted to approve the connection after having first made the
findings set forth in paragraph (c) of section 8 of chapter 372 of the acts of 1984 and having
made such other determinations in accordance with applicable policies of the authority and after
all required approvals have been received including, as applicable, the approval of the
community of origin, transporting community, all other local and state regulatory bodies where
required and the authority’s advisory board.
of 2